test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - påll e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     påll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: påll
     påll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pååll
     påll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pååll
     påll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: pollu
     påll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: påållast
     påll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: påållain
     påll+N+Ess+Indef: pållan
     påll+N+Par+Indef: pållad
     påll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [påålltaa, påålltää]
     påll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pååll
     påll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: påållai
     påll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: påållaid
     påll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: påållaid
     påll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: påållain
     påll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: påållaivuiʹm
     påll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [påållaitaa, påållaitää]
